Twolc.seemode/Contents/Resources/twolc-template.twolc
Alphabet

! The alphabet should contain all symbols which are used in the grammar.
! Symbols consist of strings of utf-8 characters. Reserved words and white-space
! need to be quoted using %.
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n ŋ o p q r s š t u v w x y z ž å ä ö N:m N:n ;

Sets
Consonant = b c d f g h j k l m n ŋ p q r s š t v w x z ž m n ;
Vow = a e i o u y å ä ö ;

Definitions

ClosedSyllable = :Vow+ [ ~:Vow ]+ ;

Rules

!The rules are taken from our North Sámi analyser. They are there merely to test
! the syntax colouring, and are not necessarily complete or meaningful.

! The following outcommented rule should not appear in the popup menu:

!"Word Final Cluster Simplification 5"                 ! bearjadahka : bearjadat
!  h:t <=> Vow _ ':0 [t:0 | k:0] (Hyph) #:  ;
! Splitting WFCF 4 into 2 to handle the inserted ':0 symbol.
! But this seems already covered by "Word Final Consonant Neutralization 1"

"Word Final Double Consonant Simplification"          ! muitaluss : muitalus
  Cy:0 <=> Vow Cx: _ ( %>: ) ( »: ) (Hyph) [ # | #: ]  ;
            where Cx in (s š d ž)
                  Cy in (s š d ž)
            matched ;

"d-deletion in compounding"
  d:0 =>                _ ': j: Vow:0 W3: ;             ! vuod'ja:vuoj-
                        _ d j Vow:0 W3: ;               ! áddjá:ádj-
         [ l | j: | v ] _ [ m: | n: | ŋ: ] Vow:0 W3: ;  ! geaidnu:geain-
                   Vow: _ d: Vow:0 W3: ;                ! gáddi:gád-

"Postvocalic j Surfacing"
  j:i <= _ [Cns | ( DummyNotY5: ) #: ] ;

"Negated Postvocalic j Surfacing"
  j:i /<= _ ~[Cns | ( DummyNotY5: ) #: ] ;
